browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2761 Y 1
SFX 2761 0 ditga .
SFX 1454 Y 1
SFX 1454 0 taria .
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 0 alisond .
SFX 4265 Y 1
SFX 4265 0 orà .
SFX 1172 Y 1
SFX 1172 0 grafia .
SFX 1551 Y 1
SFX 1551 0 grafic .
SFX 2556 Y 1
SFX 2556 0 mettevan .
SFX 2555 Y 1
SFX 2555 0 mettevas .
SFX 4025 Y 1
SFX 4025 0 siunass .
SFX 1823 Y 1
SFX 1823 0 taivel .
SFX 2437 Y 1
SFX 2437 0 ssia .
SFX 3924 Y 1
SFX 3924 0 tifitgai .
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 0 tifitgar .
SFX 1652 Y 1
SFX 1652 0 mentass .
SFX 909 Y 1
SFX 909 0 inesch .
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 0 ometria .
SFX 4276 Y 1
SFX 4276 0 ometric .
SFX 851 Y 1
SFX 851 0 uladas .
SFX 4514 Y 1
SFX 4514 0 istissan .
SFX 4513 Y 1
SFX 4513 0 istissas .
SFX 4022 Y 1
SFX 4022 0 siunava .
SFX 3747 Y 1
SFX 3747 0 ulenza .
SFX 2846 Y 1
SFX 2846 0 alpin .
SFX 812 Y 1
SFX 812 0 sesch .
SFX 4899 Y 1
SFX 4899 0 chazzetta .
SFX 3257 Y 1
SFX 3257 0 isticas .
SFX 1649 Y 1
SFX 1649 0 mentava .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 0 furma .
SFX 668 Y 1
SFX 668 0 dada .
SFX 494 Y 1
SFX 494 0 dads .
SFX 3950 Y 1
SFX 3950 0 tegn .
SFX 2645 Y 1
SFX 2645 0 ignassan .
SFX 502 Y 1
SFX 502 0 alisesch .
SFX 2644 Y 1
SFX 2644 0 ignassas .
SFX 4056 Y 1
SFX 4056 0 segnadas .
SFX 4961 Y 1
SFX 4961 0 avant .
SFX 3295 Y 1
SFX 3295 0 ilai .
SFX 3293 Y 1
SFX 3293 0 ilar .
SFX 3467 Y 1
SFX 3467 0 cola .
SFX 2056 Y 1
SFX 2056 0 tschadas .
SFX 4506 Y 1
SFX 4506 0 istrai .
SFX 4503 Y 1
SFX 4503 0 istrar .
SFX 4480 Y 1
SFX 4480 0 itian .
SFX 4479 Y 1
SFX 4479 0 itias .
SFX 2768 Y 1
SFX 2768 0 diever .
SFX 2590 Y 1
SFX 2590 0 liadas .
SFX 4941 Y 1
SFX 4941 0 beschan .
SFX 4940 Y 1
SFX 4940 0 beschas .
SFX 518 Y 1
SFX 518 0 schian .
SFX 541 Y 1
SFX 541 0 schias .
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 0 cond .
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 0 dain .
SFX 409 Y 1
SFX 409 0 dais .
SFX 1453 Y 1
SFX 1453 0 tels .
SFX 693 Y 1
SFX 693 0 egiond .
SFX 4817 Y 1
SFX 4817 0 ectà .
SFX 3674 Y 1
SFX 3674 0 uplavan .
SFX 3673 Y 1
SFX 3673 0 uplavas .
SFX 1116 Y 1
SFX 1116 0 schida .
SFX 1561 Y 1
SFX 1561 0 enzas .
SFX 1133 Y 1
SFX 1133 0 ografia .
SFX 1476 Y 1
SFX 1476 0 ografic .
SFX 1609 Y 1
SFX 1609 0 schids .
SFX 419 Y 1
SFX 419 0 tend .
SFX 1240 Y 1
SFX 1240 0 tent .
SFX 4256 Y 1
SFX 4256 0 orisai .
SFX 4841 Y 1
SFX 4841 0 dala .
SFX 4253 Y 1
SFX 4253 0 orisar .
SFX 1985 Y 1
SFX 1985 0 zzà .
SFX 4869 Y 1
SFX 4869 0 corean .
SFX 889 Y 1
SFX 889 0 tgà .
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 0 davan .
SFX 3493 Y 1
SFX 3493 0 chentadas .
SFX 755 Y 1
SFX 755 0 davas .
SFX 988 Y 1
SFX 988 0 tgond .
SFX 3005 Y 1
SFX 3005 0 tgì .
SFX 4732 Y 1
SFX 4732 0 ernai .
SFX 3393 Y 1
SFX 3393 0 ernal .
SFX 2773 Y 1
SFX 2773 0 dant .
SFX 2315 Y 1
SFX 2315 0 cular .
SFX 1057 Y 1
SFX 1057 0 iescha .
SFX 4972 Y 1
SFX 4972 0 atavan .
SFX 4971 Y 1
SFX 4971 0 atavas .
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 0 tinassan .
SFX 2064 Y 1
SFX 2064 0 tinassas .
SFX 2079 Y 1
SFX 2079 0 tera .
SFX 1340 Y 1
SFX 1340 0 ters .
SFX 1534 Y 1
SFX 1534 0 itescha .
SFX 507 Y 1
SFX 507 0 alisassan .
SFX 506 Y 1
SFX 506 0 alisassas .
SFX 4939 Y 1
SFX 4939 0 beschia .
SFX 2378 Y 1
SFX 2378 0 uidas .
SFX 3010 Y 1
SFX 3010 0 tesa .
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 0 adras .
SFX 1295 Y 1
SFX 1295 0 fassan .
SFX 1294 Y 1
SFX 1294 0 fassas .
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 tess .
SFX 3285 Y 1
SFX 3285 0 illa .
SFX 4173 Y 1
SFX 4173 0 riels .
SFX 1302 Y 1
SFX 1302 0 entscha .
SFX 4281 Y 1
SFX 4281 0 olais .
SFX 1558 Y 1
SFX 1558 0 fadas .
SFX 2772 Y 1
SFX 2772 0 democratic .
SFX 645 Y 1
SFX 645 0 alisaziun .
SFX 2595 Y 1
SFX 2595 0 laina .
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 0 dass .
SFX 4183 Y 1
SFX 4183 0 ranza .
SFX 401 Y 1
SFX 401 0 teva .
SFX 803 Y 1
SFX 803 0 usadad .
SFX 1173 Y 1
SFX 1173 0 graf .
SFX 1171 Y 1
SFX 1171 0 gram .
SFX 903 Y 1
SFX 903 0 mà .
SFX 2181 Y 1
SFX 2181 0 ivlamain .
SFX 3163 Y 1
SFX 3163 0 nisai .
SFX 439 Y 1
SFX 439 0 inà .
SFX 3160 Y 1
SFX 3160 0 nisar .
SFX 3818 Y 1
SFX 3818 0 ttai .
SFX 1798 Y 1
SFX 1798 0 ttan .
SFX 3815 Y 1
SFX 3815 0 ttar .
SFX 1587 Y 1
SFX 1587 0 ttas .
SFX 1396 Y 1
SFX 1396 0 entescha .
SFX 2228 Y 1
SFX 2228 0 ientschas .
SFX 4204 Y 1
SFX 4204 0 portond .
SFX 2106 Y 1
SFX 2106 0 schina .
SFX 3009 Y 1
SFX 3009 0 text .
SFX 4335 Y 1
SFX 4335 0 nisch .
SFX 726 Y 1
SFX 726 0 dava .
SFX 1764 Y 1
SFX 1764 0 auna .
SFX 4693 Y 1
SFX 4693 0 fader .
SFX 2691 Y 1
SFX 2691 0 fonia .
SFX 4682 Y 1
SFX 4682 0 fonic .
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 0 nada .
SFX 3197 Y 1
SFX 3197 0 minond .
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 0 nads .
SFX 4613 Y 1
SFX 4613 0 icladas .
SFX 3806 Y 1
SFX 3806 0 tter .
SFX 1360 Y 1
SFX 1360 0 mescha .
SFX 2801 Y 1
SFX 2801 0 atisescha .
SFX 3112 Y 1
SFX 3112 0 punais .
SFX 3429 Y 1
SFX 3429 0 egliassan .
SFX 3428 Y 1
SFX 3428 0 egliassas .
SFX 4963 Y 1
SFX 4963 0 aura .
SFX 4784 Y 1
SFX 4784 0 electric .
SFX 1706 Y 1
SFX 1706 0 iders .
SFX 416 Y 1
SFX 416 0 zai .
SFX 414 Y 1
SFX 414 0 zan .
SFX 1834 Y 1
SFX 1834 0 ritad .
SFX 367 Y 1
SFX 367 0 zar .
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 0 zas .
SFX 946 Y 1
SFX 946 0 mond .
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 0 trada .
SFX 374 Y 1
SFX 374 0 chai .
SFX 603 Y 1
SFX 603 0 chan .
SFX 2983 Y 1
SFX 2983 0 trads .
SFX 699 Y 1
SFX 699 0 char .
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 0 chas .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 0 chau .
SFX 3805 Y 1
SFX 3805 0 ttia .
SFX 2957 Y 1
SFX 2957 0 turai .
SFX 3802 Y 1
SFX 3802 0 ttin .
SFX 2954 Y 1
SFX 2954 0 turar .
SFX 4994 Y 1
SFX 4994 0 anissem .
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 0 turas .
SFX 530 Y 1
SFX 530 0 nain .
SFX 421 Y 1
SFX 421 0 nais .
SFX 2550 Y 1
SFX 2550 0 naiv .
SFX 3152 Y 1
SFX 3152 0 nisesch .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 isada .
SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 0 isads .
SFX 1422 Y 1
SFX 1422 0 uneschian .
SFX 1421 Y 1
SFX 1421 0 uneschias .
SFX 2422 Y 1
SFX 2422 0 stond .
SFX 2392 Y 1
SFX 2392 0 tunada .
SFX 3798 Y 1
SFX 3798 0 tunads .
SFX 3632 Y 1
SFX 3632 0 zer .
SFX 3191 Y 1
SFX 3191 0 nals .
SFX 1362 Y 1
SFX 1362 0 menta .
SFX 1403 Y 1
SFX 1403 0 chel .
SFX 3497 Y 1
SFX 3497 0 chen .
SFX 1196 Y 1
SFX 1196 0 cher .
SFX 1938 Y 1
SFX 1938 0 chet .
SFX 621 Y 1
SFX 621 0 ments .
SFX 2351 Y 1
SFX 2351 0 vegnissan .
SFX 2350 Y 1
SFX 2350 0 vegnissas .
SFX 4596 Y 1
SFX 4596 0 iculara .
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 0 aschond .
SFX 629 Y 1
SFX 629 0 bilitad .
SFX 3973 Y 1
SFX 3973 0 tanzas .
SFX 2981 Y 1
SFX 2981 0 train .
SFX 2980 Y 1
SFX 2980 0 trais .
SFX 4772 Y 1
SFX 4772 0 ellavan .
SFX 2795 Y 1
SFX 2795 0 atisond .
SFX 4771 Y 1
SFX 4771 0 ellavas .
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 0 unond .
SFX 689 Y 1
SFX 689 0 ifitgada .
SFX 4444 Y 1
SFX 4444 0 lecziun .
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207 0 irond .
SFX 718 Y 1
SFX 718 0 ifitgads .
SFX 1995 Y 1
SFX 1995 0 ziunavan .
SFX 1994 Y 1
SFX 1994 0 ziunavas .
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 0 isain .
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 isais .
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 0 zia .
SFX 3629 Y 1
SFX 3629 0 zis .
SFX 382 Y 1
SFX 382 0 chia .
SFX 4897 Y 1
SFX 4897 0 chim .
SFX 2784 Y 1
SFX 2784 0 chin .
SFX 3475 Y 1
SFX 3475 0 chis .
SFX 3796 Y 1
SFX 3796 0 tunain .
SFX 3795 Y 1
SFX 3795 0 tunais .
SFX 4766 Y 1
SFX 4766 0 endai .
SFX 4763 Y 1
SFX 4763 0 endan .
SFX 864 Y 1
SFX 864 0 madas .
SFX 2300 Y 1
SFX 2300 0 endas .
SFX 4611 Y 1
SFX 4611 0 iclai .
SFX 4933 Y 1
SFX 4933 0 bilisadas .
SFX 4608 Y 1
SFX 4608 0 iclar .
SFX 3321 Y 1
SFX 3321 0 iclas .
SFX 2309 Y 1
SFX 2309 0 drà .
SFX 3221 Y 1
SFX 3221 0 mentesch .
SFX 3189 Y 1
SFX 3189 0 nari .
SFX 4392 Y 1
SFX 4392 0 mentian .
SFX 4391 Y 1
SFX 4391 0 mentias .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 0 fitgai .
SFX 3372 Y 1
SFX 3372 0 fitgar .
SFX 3550 Y 1
SFX 3550 0 'aura .
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76 0 dad .
SFX 425 Y 1
SFX 425 0 dai .
SFX 2774 Y 1
SFX 2774 0 dal .
SFX 924 Y 1
SFX 924 0 dan .
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 0 dar .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 0 das .
SFX 4839 Y 1
SFX 4839 0 dat .
SFX 4380 Y 1
SFX 4380 0 misaziun .
SFX 3530 Y 1
SFX 3530 0 ccassan .
SFX 3529 Y 1
SFX 3529 0 ccassas .
SFX 552 Y 1
SFX 552 0 nass .
SFX 2318 Y 1
SFX 2318 0 chla .
SFX 716 Y 1
SFX 716 0 ifitgain .
SFX 715 Y 1
SFX 715 0 ifitgais .
SFX 4938 Y 1
SFX 4938 0 beschian .
SFX 4937 Y 1
SFX 4937 0 beschias .
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 0 isant .
SFX 3225 Y 1
SFX 3225 0 mader .
SFX 3414 Y 1
SFX 3414 0 ender .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 nava .
SFX 4104 Y 1
SFX 4104 0 schentada .
SFX 3577 Y 1
SFX 3577 0 anai .
SFX 4102 Y 1
SFX 4102 0 schentads .
