browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
appar/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,48,49,50,51,52,56,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,136,177,195,472,600,643,706,719,926,1601,1754,3949,3950
chomma/1,598,4173
com/5,67,99,102,107,185,200,326,354,436,902,1007,1376,1645,1647,1648,1649,1650,1651,1652,1653,1654,1655,1656,1657,1658,1659,1660,2172,2535,2567,2568,3254,3543,4988
cus/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,56,57,60,71,72,73,74,86,102,135,145,147,148,149,150,152,157,158,159,161,163,164,180,246,290,443,516,634,672,702,986,994,1020,1208,1565,1823,1829,1939,2783,2784,3476,3477,3478,3479,3480,3481,3482,3483,3484,3485,3486,3487,3488,3489,3490,3491,3492,3493,3494,3495,3496
d'o/234,606,703,1174,1196,2315,4379
empermet/60,82,138,140,142,159,164,173,175,225,401,402,419,429,430,431,432,1240,2411
flan/30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,70,203,235,242,243,393,454,455,537,538,557,558,559,560,561,562,563,564,565,566,567,1021,1022,1023,1024,1025,1194,1195,1571,1816,1839,1927
flat/98,138,140,142,150,157,158,160,161,163,166,167,168,169,170,171,185,316,317,318,319,320,332,333,572,702,784,870,1031,1113,1208,3747
fraud/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,141,426,739,773,805,840,841,842,843,844,845,846,847,848,849,850,851,929,930,931,932,933,934,935,2377,2915,3748
gas/5,98,188,246,291,535,643,660,685,688,689,690,711,712,713,714,715,716,718,721,1454,1475,4276,4277
liber/1,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,68,70,78,80,146,150,160,183,217,252,295,366,428,456,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,505,506,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,645,734,939,1407
mar/1,5,6,8,9,13,72,144,243,310,359,368,517,571,1128,1134,1179,1453,1790,1910,2243,2340,2341,2884,3018,3948,4337,4396
mascha/409,425,441,602,668,669,697,726,727,728,755,756,757,758,2767,3458
mez/1,179,234,1551
mon/3,5,9,15,95,183,373,750,1001,1114,1133,1473,1476,1527,1557,1912,1919,1920,2139,2307,2419,2546,3333,3564,4647,4676,4985
Mon/56,99,373,668,1599,3333
mor/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,10,12,13,22,23,54,55,56,60,82,84,180,201,303,698,790,831,924,992,1179,1207,1307,1429,1572,1641,2082,2097,2284,2734,2771,2993,2994,2995,3907,3908,3909,3910,3911,3912,3913,3914,3915,3916,3917,3918,3919,3920,3921,3922,3923,3924,3925,3926,3975,4962
mut/1,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,60,68,95,156,298,310,570,1241,2629,2630,2631,2632,2633,2634,2635,2636,2637,2638,3284,3287,3288,3289,3290,3291,3292,3293,3294,3295,3296,3297,4551
ord/83,439,451,469,485,492,532,533,1699,2021,2850,3268,4403,4961
ortofoto/1172
ost/6,626,2846
percur/404,433,434,776,815,816,817,818,819,1116,1117,1347,1609,1610,2436,3979
platta/3354
poligon/4276
por/3,5,98,242,248,291,403,420,476,518,541,1611,1783,3144
puc/143,1364,2177,2179,2574,2585,2589,2590
quint/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,10,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,78,88,102,183,556,802,1199,2030,3416,3665,3666,3667,3668,3669,3670,3671,3672,3673,3674,3675,3676,3677,3678,3679,3680,3681,3682,3683,3684,3685,3686
sbat/60,82,138,140,142,159,164,173,175,225,401,402,419,428,429,430,431,432,853,885,886,887,2996
sem/1,9,313,1044,1561,2292,2536,2603,2907
son/102,310,669,784,1099,1133,4968
stat/56,366,422,630,1028,1328,1329,1330,1331,1332,1333,1334,1425,1884,2384,2940,3257,3560,3757
sula/1985
sur/5,65,308,381,445,671,741,742,1260,1269,1469,1768,1921,1922,1923,1924,1925,2011,2013,2021,2052,2083,2244,2245,2375,2768,2818,2890,3124,3187,3380,3549,3760,3896,4038,4189,4193,4197,4230,4234,4294,4310,4403,4437,4438,4439,4440,4441,4442,4443,4675,4758,4905,4958,4959
surd/1,3,5,30,31,32,33,34,35,38,43,44,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,132,143,144,177,822,3055,3103,3745,4174,4263,4265
trapl/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,88,105,2225,2640,2641,2642,2643,2644,2645,2646,2647,2648,2649,2650,2651,2652,2653,3298,3299,3300,4555,4556,4557,4559
tschappa/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,53,62,63,4899
tuppa/65,76,296,494
vain/2773
vel/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,57,183,339,642,666,693,694,695,696,723,724,725,751,752,753,754,787,788,1045
